Missouri, session 2026, HB1627.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 178.550, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 178.550, to read as follows:
178.550. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Career and
Technical Education Student Protection Act". There is hereby established the "Career and
Technical Education Advisory Council" within the department of elementary and secondary
education.
2. The advisory council shall be composed of [sixteen members who shall be]
Missouri residents. The director of the department of economic development and the
commissioner of higher education, or [his or her designee] their designees, shall be [a
member] members. The commissioner of education, in collaboration with appropriate
stakeholders, shall appoint the following members:
(1) A director or administrator of a career and technical education center;
(2) [An individual from the business community with a background in commerce]
Four individuals from business and commerce;
(3) A representative from State Technical College of Missouri;
(4) Three current or retired career and technical education teachers who also serve or
served as an advisor to any of the nationally recognized career and technical education
student organizations of:
(a) DECA;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1627 2
(b) Future Business Leaders of America (FBLA);
(c) FFA;
(d) Family, Career and Community Leaders of America (FCCLA);
(e) [Health Occupations Students of America (HOSA)] HOSA-Future Health
Professionals;
(f) SkillsUSA; or
(g) Technology Student Association (TSA);
(5) A representative from a business organization, association of businesses, or a
business coalition;
(6) A representative from a Missouri community college;
(7) A representative from [Southeast Missouri State University or the University of
Central] a Missouri four-year college or university;
(8) An individual participating in an apprenticeship recognized by the department of
labor and industrial relations or approved by the United States Department of Labor's Office
of Apprenticeship;
(9) A school administrator or school superintendent of a school that offers career and
technical education; and
(10) A student-services representative, who may serve in a school counseling or
career resource educator position.
3. Members appointed by the commissioner of education shall serve a term of [five]
three years [except for the initial appointments, which shall be for the following lengths:
(1) One member shall be appointed for a term of one year;
(2) Two members shall be appointed for a term of two years;
(3) Two members shall be appointed for a term of three years;
(4) Three members shall be appointed for a term of four years;
(5) Three members shall be appointed for a term of five years] and shall serve no
more than two terms.
4. Four members shall be from the general assembly. The president pro tempore of
the senate shall appoint two members of the senate of whom not more than one shall be of the
same party. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members of the
house of representatives of whom not more than one shall be of the same party. The
legislative members shall serve on the advisory council until such time as they resign, are no
longer members of the general assembly, or are replaced by new appointments.
5. The advisory council shall have [three] nonvoting ex officio members[:
(1) A director of guidance and counseling services at the department of elementary
and secondary education, or a similar position if such position ceases to exist;
(2) The director of the division of workforce development; and

HB 1627 3
(3) A member of the coordinating board for higher education, as selected by the
coordinating board], all of whom shall be employees of the department of elementary and
secondary education selected by the commissioner of education.
6. The assistant commissioner for the office of college and career readiness of the
department of elementary and secondary education shall provide staff assistance to the
advisory council.
7. The advisory council shall meet at least [four] two times annually. The advisory
council may make all rules it deems necessary to enable it to conduct its meetings, elect its
officers, and set the terms and duties of its officers. The advisory council shall elect from
among its members a [chairperson] chair, vice [chairperson] chair, a secretary-reporter, and
such other officers as it deems necessary. Members of the advisory council shall serve
without compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses necessary to the
performance of their official duties for the advisory council.
8. Any business to come before the advisory council shall be available on the
advisory council's internet website [at least seven business days prior to the start of each
meeting] as provided under section 610.020. All records of any decisions, votes, exhibits,
or outcomes shall be available on the advisory council's internet website within forty-eight
hours following the conclusion of every meeting. [Any materials prepared for the members
shall be delivered to the members at least five days before the meeting, and to the extent such
materials are public records as defined in section 610.010 and are not permitted to be closed
under section 610.021, shall be made available on the advisory council's internet website at
least five business days in advance of the meeting.
9. The advisory council shall make an annual written report to the state board of
education and the commissioner of education regarding the development, implementation,
and administration of the state budget for career and technical education.
10. The advisory council shall annually submit written recommendations to the state
board of education and the commissioner of education regarding the oversight and procedures
for the handling of funds for student career and technical education organizations.
11.] 9. The advisory council shall:
(1) Develop a comprehensive statewide short- and long-range strategic plan for career
and technical education;
(2) Identify service gaps and provide advice on methods to close such gaps as they
relate to youth and adult employees, workforce development, and employers on training
needs;
(3) Confer with public and private entities for the purpose of promoting and
improving career and technical education;
(4) Identify legislative recommendations to improve career and technical education;

HB 1627 4
(5) Promote coordination of existing career and technical education programs;
(6) Adopt, alter, or repeal by its own bylaws, rules and regulations governing the
manner in which its business may be transacted.
[12.] 10. For purposes of this section, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall provide such documentation and information as to allow the advisory council
to be effective.
[13.] 11. For purposes of this section, "advisory council" shall mean the career and
technical education advisory council.
✔